Hawaii statutes.
§601-3 Administrative director. (a)
The chief justice, with the approval of the supreme court, shall appoint an
administrative director of the courts to assist the chief justice in directing
the administration of the judiciary. The administrative director shall be a
resident of the State for a continuous period of three years prior to the
administrative director's appointment, and shall be appointed without regard to
chapter 76 and shall serve at the pleasure of the chief justice. The
administrative director shall hold no other office or employment. Effective
July 1, 2014, the salary of the administrative director of the courts shall be
equal to the salary of the administrative director of the State as set by the
commission on salaries pursuant to section 26-56.

(b) The administrative director shall, subject
to the direction of the chief justice, perform the following functions:

(1) Examine the administrative methods of the courts
and make recommendations to the chief justice for their improvement;

(2) Examine the state of the dockets of the courts,
secure information as to their needs of assistance, if any, prepare statistical
data and reports of the business of the courts and advise the chief justice to
the end that proper action may be taken;

(3) Examine the estimates of the courts for
appropriations and present to the chief justice the administrative director's
recommendations concerning them;

(4) Examine the statistical systems of the courts and
make recommendations to the chief justice for a uniform system of judicial
statistics;

(5) Collect, analyze, and report to the chief justice
statistical and other data concerning the business of the courts;

(6) Assist the chief justice in the preparation of
the budget, the six-year program and financial plan, the variance report and
any other reports requested by the legislature;

(7) Carry out all duties and responsibilities that
are specified in title 7 as it pertains to employees of the judiciary; and

(8) Attend to such other matters as may be assigned
by the chief justice.

(c) The administrative director, with the
approval of the chief justice, shall appoint a deputy administrative director
of the courts without regard to chapter 76 and such assistants as may be
necessary. The assistants shall be appointed without regard to chapter 76.
Effective July 1, 2014, the salary of the deputy administrative director shall
be equal to ninety-five per cent of the salary of the administrative director.
The administrative director shall be provided with necessary office facilities.

(d) The judges, clerks, officers, and
employees of the courts shall comply with all requests of the administrative
director for information and statistical data relating to the business of the
courts and expenditure of public funds for their maintenance and operation.

(e) The salary levels of the administrative
director and deputy administrative director shall be disclosed in the
judiciary's annual budget submission to the legislature. [L 1959, c 259, pt of
§1(b); am imp L 1965, c 97, §24; am L 1965, c 223, §11; Supp, §213-1.6; HRS
§601-3; am L 1969, c 127, §9; am L 1974, c 159, §16; am L 1975, c 58, §25; am L
1976, c 82, §1; am L 1977, c 159, §18; am L 1982, c 129, §24(1); gen ch 1985;
am L 1986, c 128, §21; am L 1990, c 72, §7; am L 1991, c 130, §2; am L 2000, c
142, §2 and c 253, §150; am L 2003, c 123, §1; am L 2006, c 299, §6; am L 2014,
c 180, §1]

Cross References

See Const. art. VI, §6.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next